Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 2

Division of Juvenile Probation [Repealed]

37-3-201 — 37-3-209. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§37-3-201 —37-3-209 (Acts 1957, ch. 278, §§ 1-3; 1965, ch. 347, § 1; 1975, ch. 326, §§ 4, 5; 1980, ch. 865, § 11; T.C.A., §§ 37-901 — 37-903, 37-905 — 37-909; Acts 1989, ch. 278, §§ 13, 75), concerning the division of juvenile probation, was repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 118, effective May 21, 1996.